District of Columbia statutes.
6-1408

Documents Act.

The editorial standards for numbering, grammar, and style required by the District of Columbia Office of Documents Act, § 2-612(5), shall not apply to the Construction Codes. The Construction Codes shall be consolidated by the District of Columbia Office of Documents into a single new title of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations to be designated by the District of Columbia Office of Documents. Each component part of the Construction Codes shall be available for sale separately.

History

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 9, 34 DCR 1072

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-1308.